Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4415.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 10. (1) The clerk and the members of a board of county road commissioners are subject to 1968 PA 317, MCL 15.321 to 15.330. (2) The board of county road commissioners shall employ a competent county highway engineer who shall make surveys ordered by the board, prepare plans and specifications for roads, bridges, and culverts, and exercise general supervision over construction to insure that the plans and specifications are strictly followed. Two or more adjoining counties may employ the same engineer, if the work in 1 or more of the counties is not enough to employ the whole time of the engineer. The engineer employed by the board is known as the county highway engineer. (3) The board may also engage other professional and consultant services as it considers necessary to implement this act and promote efficiency and economy in the operation of the county road system. The board may also employ other necessary laborers and may purchase machines, tools, appliances, and materials that the board considers necessary or convenient for the performance of work by the laborers. Subject to subsection (4), in cases involving the expenditure of an amount greater than $75,000.00 for the purchase of machines, tools, appliances, and materials, the board of county road commissioners shall advertise for sealed proposals for the machines, tools, appliances, and materials proposed to be purchased, except under emergency conditions, in which case the limit must not exceed $250,000.00. All purchases made under this section must be compiled separately for purposes of board approval. The board shall advertise for sealed proposals for the purchase of passenger vehicles and trucks weighing less than 10,000 pounds. The board may purchase surplus properties from the state and federal governments without advertising for sealed proposals. (4) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state treasurer shall adjust the dollar amounts under subsection (3) by the percentage increase in the Detroit Consumer Price Index for the preceding calendar year and round to the nearest $100.00 increment. As used in this subsection, âDetroit Consumer Price Indexâ means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (5) Each county road commission shall take all reasonable steps to ensure minority business enterprises have the equal opportunity to compete and perform contracts or purchases of services, or both, for the county road commission. The county road commission shall issue a plan for implementing this subsection. (6) A county road commission may enter into a contract or agreement for the purchase of real or personal property for public purposes, to be paid for in installments over a period not to exceed 30 years or the useful life of the property acquired, whichever is less. Real or personal property purchased under this act may serve as collateral in support of the purchase, contract, or agreement. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor